Washington statutes.
RCW 3.42.040

Compensation.

District court commissioners shall receive such compensation as the county legislative authority or city council shall provide.

[ 1984 c 258 s 33; 1969 ex.s. c 66 s 4; 1961 c 299 s 34.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

District court commissioners

salary: RCW 3.58.030.

travel expenses: RCW 3.58.040.